Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Steve Rhodes
     "We were somewhere on the edge of the desert when the drugs took
hold," explains the stoned and wild-eyed journalist Raoul Duke.  He
speeds along like an out-of-control missile in the opening to FEAR AND
LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS, which is based on the famous
semi-autobiographical novel by Hunter Thompson about his gonzo
journalism.  Set in a stoned-out 1971, the movie's central character,
Raoul, and his sidekick and attorney, Dr. Gonzo, spend the entire
picture ripped, stoned, plastered, wasted, you name it.  With a
cornucopia of drugs in the trunk of their rented Cadillac convertible,
they are on their way to Las Vegas, where they will cover the national
convention of District Attorneys, among other things.  Mainly they are
going so they can party using every illegal substance you've ever heard
of and some you haven't.
     As directed by the wildly imaginative Terry Gilliam from MONTY
PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL, BRAZIL, THE FISHER KING and TWELVE MONKEYS,
the comedy starts off so ridiculously that you can expect many people
to walk out in disgust.
     The remarkably talented Johnny Depp plays the lead, Raoul.  To his
credit, Depp takes what starts as an almost unwatchably bad movie and
manages to make it kind of fascinating.  With arms waving at imagined
terrors, with feet and legs wobbling so he can barely walk without
falling, and with a voice that sounds like it's coming from the bottom
of a well, he looks so convincingly drugged out of his mind that you'll
want to help him into treatment.  When he walks, he darts from wall to
wall due to his drug-induced paranoia.  You see, he has killer bats
chasing him.  Depp's performance is so over the top and mesmerizing
that he manages to make you care about a highly unsympathetic
character.
     Benicio Del Toro takes a more by the numbers approach to the part
of Dr. Gonzo.  He mumbles so many of his lines that he makes his
character believable but rarely interesting.
     A host of actors appear in cameo roles.  Gary Busey plays a macho
policeman who chases the speeding and stoned Raoul.  The policeman is
an understanding sort, who orders Raoul to get some rest and asks only
for a little kiss in return.  Christina Ricci plays a teenager who
paints large oil portraits of Barbra Streisand while watching her on
television.  Raoul and Dr. Gonzo have nightmares about her naming them
in a statutory rape trial.
     In one of the film's best scenes, Raoul's drugged brain morphs a
bar of conventioneers into a group of alien monsters like those in the
bar scene in STAR WARS.  In another scene, the pattern in the carpet
starts to move and eventually turns to flowing blood.  The special
effects in the movie are inventive and the psychedelic colors of the
sets by THE CROW's Alex McDowell are eye-catching.  And when the movie
gets utterly absurd, as it frequently does, at least the audience is
entertained by some great music of the late 60s and early 70s.
     FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS runs 1:55.  It is rated R for
constant drug usage and would be fine for kids only if they are of
college age.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Terry Gilliam
Writers: Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies, and Alex Cox (based on
the novel by Hunter S. Thompson)
Starring: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Christina Ricci, Gary Busey, Tobey
Maguire, Ellen Barkin, Cameron Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Katherine Helmond,
Flea, Michael Jeter, Lyle Lovett, Harry Dean Stanton, James Woods
One could probably read Hunter S. Thompson's novel "Fear and Loathing Las
Vegas" while watching Terry Gilliam's film "Fear and Loathing Las Vegas"
and find that everything is nicely in synch with one another.  Fans of
filmed novels, especially cult classics like this one, almost get off on
pointing out every single little difference, no matter what the size is,
will actually find that the film version of this novel ranks as one of the
most faithful film adaptations, up there with, say, Orson Welles version of
Kafka's "The Trial."
Of course, film and books are different kinds of mediums: books let our
imaginations bring the story alive, directed by almost painstaking detail,
comparitively; films give our imaginations a break, and lure us into a
sensual lull, although some often stimulate the brain with themes and
concepts, like books do.  Thus, a film that is totally faithful to a novel
does not always mean a great thing.  The film needs to be successful in
terms of film, and being faithful to the novel doesn't need to come first. 
Last year's "The Shining" mini-series, starring Steven Weber and Rebecca
DeMournay, taught us that.
However, Terry Gilliam, ex-Monty Python-er and cult director ("Brazil," "12
Monkeys," etc.), is one of the best contemporary directors in terms of
making a film an experience to savor, and he and the other screenwriters
(Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies, and Alex Cox, the latter who was supposed to
direct this flick but was canned from the job), make "Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas" The Film not only satisfying in terms of an adaptation, but also
does a great job in capturing the tone and detached wry wit of the film. 
He gives the film a distinct visual flair, putting us in what Gilliam
envisions as the mind of Thompson, and even allows the narration to
continually quote from the book's hilarious verses, making this one of the
most faithful film adaptations not only in terms of substance, but also
style.
However, this total faithfulness does raise a couple problems, like the way
that the film relies so much on Thompson's narration that it runs into some
problems with telling the story.  Or the way that it tells of a time that
is probably unfamiliar to many of the people this flick targets (other than
fans of the novel, this film is aimed towards Generation Xers, and anyone
younger), which is the early 70s when drugs began to loose the steam they
had, yet people like Thompson were still doing it, seperating themselves
from the society.  The film doesn't do the best job of establishing the way
it felt in general, other than showing some news clips of Nixon and
Vietnam.  I mean, I had to do research just to know the importance of this
novel.  The novel is a piece of journalism, reporting not only the way it
was, but the way he felt to be apart of it all.  It was blunt, it was
concise, and a film is not really the best way of making itself a piece of
journalism, like the book was.
But before I go on, let me explain the plot a bit.  "Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas" was the true account (or what he could remember) of his trip to
Vegas (duh) with his one lawyer friend to cover a desert racing event and
later a Drug Enforcement Seminar.  Prior to going, his friend "advises" him
to buy a red convertible, jazz up his wardrobe with lots of hawaiian
tee-shirts, and buy as much drugs and alchohol as possible.  With all the
drugs in a briefcase, they take off for the strip, downing as many drugs as
possible, ironically in the same place where marijuana possession means
about 10 years, and selling means life.
Johnny Depp plays the Thompson character, who goes by his pseudonym Raoul
Duke, and wears a white cap, sunglasses, with his head balding rapidly, and
with a cigarrette perpetually dangling from the corner of his mouth, all
while talking in a really fast, deep voice in what is his reality and also
on the narration (he really does look and sound like a young Thompson); and
Benicio Del Toro plays the lawyer friend, sadly named Dr. Gonzo (after the
term "gonzo journalism," which Thompson created from this book), burying
his usual cool looks under about 40 or so more pounds than usual, as well
as long, puffy hair, nicely creating the "300-pound somoan" that Thompson
describes his prose.
Together, they proceed to wreak havoc on the denizens and locales of Vegas,
primarily the two hotel rooms they stay in during the course of the film. 
They run into various people, who show up briefly, then disappear, some who
occasionally re-appear for a couple brief seconds, giving them a sense of
alienation in the world.  Alas, this means lots of cameos, with some great
stand-outs from: Christina Ricci, as a Jesus freak who, um, paints Barbara
Streisand portraits, or at least attempts to; Tobey Maguire, as an
unfortunate hitch-hiker; Cameron Diaz, as a kinda flirtatious chick on an
elevator; Ellen Barkin, as a saddened diner waitress; Michael Jeter, as an
out-of-touch speaker at the DEA conference; and Gary Busey, as a police
officer who specializes in desert control.  Some credits have listed James
Woods in the cast as well, but I couldn't find him.  If you do, please tell
me.
This is exactly how the book felt - a supporting character would enter the
story for a couple pages, then leave a bit, and it successfully distanced
the leads from everyone else in the world.  The film does this nicely as
well.  The film is also very effective in giving everything the right
atmosphere, staging some of the best sequences from the book wonderfully,
and even following up on some of Thompson's weirder acid flashes (the
casino becomes alive with lizards, literally, in one scene).  Gilliam also
sometimes pulls back from the leads' perspectives, showing how moronic they
look to everyone else, and how distanced from society they really are.
The narration works nicely, often following from the novel literally, and
this gives the viewer the reason to like our characters, as what they do in
the visual context of the film would probably not gain the affection of any
audience who hasn't read the book.  The film seems like it's talking to us,
commenting on what's going on from Thompson's perspective from later on, as
he is often reflecting on the experiences he had, but seems like he still
hasn't given up on them.  One of the messages of the film is to be
yourself, and not worry about what society thinks when they see you acting
weird.
The reason the novel was so important was because it came at a time when
the psychedelia of the 60s, so popular at its time, was quickly dying, and
the year it was written (1971) was a major turning point in terms of mind
expansion.  By this time, Thompson was considered an "aging hippy," and his
rapid drug use, considered so acceptible at its peak in the late 60s, as
well as his views on politics and the condition of the world at the time as
one of the main reasons he used drugs so profusely, were becoming passe. 
The novel was a portrait not only of himself, but of the people who looked
on his behavior as deviant.  The film doesn't really capture all of this,
but the sense of alienation that the characters suffer through, and the way
that their behavior was becoming more destructive than before makes this
film successful.
Of course, the film is far from perfect.  The plotlessness, which worked so
nicely in the book, doesn't work as well for the film as it did for the
movie, particularly because this film is 126 minutes long, making some of
the longer moments which go nowhere plotwise seem too much (the diner
scene, such a great part of the book, seems like a distraction in the
film).  And there are some more problems with the redundancy, which didn't
seem as apparent in the book, but seems kind of annoying here (the film
sometimes follows a trend of: do drugs, embarass one's self in public,
retreat to room, do more drugs, trash it...maybe include someone else from
time to time to shock).
Nevertheless, Gilliam does manage to keep a tight control over the film,
making the film like a really freaky trip of sorts.  We're along with the
two protatonists whether we like it or not, and thanks to some great
narration, we're almost glad to be there most of the time, when they're not
getting close to ODing and not resembling human beings at all.  Kinda like
the book in a way...kinda not...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Michael Redman
"Moderation In All Things" is the unofficial motto of the United States. From
our Puritan founding to the doorway of the 21st century, virtue is to be found
through clear thinking and clean living. Extravagance is not only imprudent,
it's a sin.
There's a different opinion held by some seekers for truth. They believe that
to truly see, you must escape the consensus reality overlay imposed by
society. They point to the theory that reaching altered states of
consciousness is a need hard-wired in the human biology. One of the first
inventions of the early nomadic tribes was the discovery that drinking
fermented honey resulted in a different reality. Around the same time, they
found that ingesting certain plants revealed a new point of view. Children
achieve the change by twirling rapidly in circles. Even animals indulge in
alcoholic rotten fruit.
Mankind has a long history of shamanistic oracles leading their people
through insights gained from drug-induced journeys. Poets, artists and others
given to intemperance live on the fringes on society, often shunned by the
mainstream, but just as often looked to as a source of insight. Frequently
these people are demented, occasionally enlightened and sometimes both.
"The road of excess leads to the palace of wisdom," writes William Blake.
Journalistic shaman Hunter S. Thompson puts it another way: "When the going
gets weird, the weird turn pro." It doesn't get any weirder than Las Vegas in
the early seventies.
The film is based on his 1971 classic novel of gonzo journalism. Supposedly
reporting on an off-road race, Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Benicio Del Toro) -- thinly disguised Thompson and associate Oscar
"Zeta" Acosta, a noted Chicano lawyer -- are actually in search of the
American dream. Loading the trunk of their rented Caddy convertible with every
known (and some unknown) drug, they head through the desert for the city of dreams.
Discussing the plot of this movie is pointless. In fact the plot itself is
pointless. Thompson's style of writing was to ingest as many mind-altering
substances as possible and write about his experiences. That many of those
experiences existed only in his head makes it impossible to tell what really
happened. And it doesn't matter. This is one man's extremely unique point of
view. If you're looking for a coherent storyline, this isn't it.
As Duke and Gonzo stumble through Las Vegas, their vision is wild and
incoherent. Lounge lizards morph into real reptiles. The carpet melts and
flows up the wall. The noted attorney sits fully clothed in a bathtub filled
with water, grapefruit rinds and assorted garbage and waving a 10-inch hunting
knife at his friend who is defending himself with a shower curtain.
The film is certainly not for everyone. It's bound for many Worst Of 98 lists
and just as likely to turn up on Bests inventories. For the first several
minutes, I thought it was remarkably insipid, but then either the film or I
changed and it became a ride through the absurd. For the first time in a long
while, I found myself laughing out loud in a movie theater. But my companion
hated the film.
This may be the most authentic depiction of the hallucinogenic drug
experience ever captured on film...or so I've been told. Several of the scenes
are accurate and hilarious at the same time. When Gonzo is trapped on a
revolving bar moving about one mile per hour and afraid to step off, some of
the audience was rolling in laughter while others were walking out.
There is a poignant moment when Thompson gazes west out of his hotel window
and talks about the hopes of the hippies who were sure that they could
transform America into a land of peace and freedom. He explains that if you
look hard enough you can see the high water mark where the wave crested and
rolled back. If there is a time of lucid truth in the film, this is it.
It's always a delight when one of Hollywood's pretty boys transforms into a
talented actor. Depp is marvelous as Thompson, reeling and darting from wall
to wall attempting to escape killer bats. Although he is smaller than the real
journalist and comes across as considerably less dangerous than the hulking
gun-toting out of control writer, his depiction works.
The other actors are equally up to task. Peppered with cameos by the real
Thompson, Ellen Barkin (in a disturbing diner scene), Penn Jillette and many
others, the film is a "spot the actor" game. A few episodes don't work. Gary
Busey as the cop who pulls Duke over is unimpressive and the scene (one of the
few not from the book) turns into a waste of time. The two-hour length could
do with a bit of trimming.
The weakest link among the actors is Del Toro. As frantic and irrational as
he is, my memory of the book's Dr. Gonzo is as even more menacing and over the
top. He's not bad, just not as on-target as possible.
Thompson is the anti-Nancy Reagan: his attitude towards drugs is obviously
"Just say yes". It's amazing that this film got made in today's social climate
and may die a rapid death at the boxoffice.
When we look back at our historic forefathers, it's tempting to remember them
as questing for freedom and forget that they were mostly criminals and
outcasts. While I'm not sure I would want Hunter Thompson as a neighbor, he
has something to say. If only we could figure out what it is.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and has seldom had a more
disorienting cinematic experience than seeing both "Fear And Loathing" and
"Godzilla" in the same evening.)
[This appeared in the 5/28/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Jason Wallis
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas * * * * (out of four)
Starring Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ellen Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron
Diaz and Tobey Maguire 
Directed by Terry Gilliam 
Rated R for profanity, non-stop drug use and general weirdness 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 125 minutes 
Since it's opening on Friday, Terry Gilliam's new film Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas has, to say the very least, not been received too well by most
film critics. I knew this before I entered the theater yesterday, so I
wasn't expecting to see the masterpiece I had anticipated ever since I saw
the first previews for the movie. However, I still had to see the flick
anyway, no matter how disappointed I might have become (I'm a die-hard
Gilliam fan). For the following two hours, I sat in my seat and scrutinized
every frame of the movie, waiting for just one single scene to slip up or
go wrong. By the time I left the theater, I was completely convinced of one
thing; along with Joel Coen and Quentin Tarantino, Gilliam is one of the
most talented directors working in Hollywood today. 
At first, I was a tad hesitant in writing this particular review because I
fully realize that I'm quite possibly the only critic on the face of this
planet that is going to praise this movie. But I'm just going to come out
and say it, just like I did last year when everyone was attacking U-Turn
and Lost Highway; I loved this movie. 
Much like the other two films I mentioned, Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas
isn't so much about story or plot as it is about style and construction.
Hell, I defy anyone to give me an even semi-rational explanation of the
plot of Lynch's Lost Highway. But like I said, plot doesn't matter; that
was an exploration of the possibilities of cinema. Much like an abstract
painting, if you will, only put on film instead of a canvas. 
How can this film be about plot when it's only existing trace of a
storyline involves a drug-addled journalist (Johnny Depp, with his head
shaved and sporting a cigarette holder) and his allegedly Samoan attorney
(Benicio Del Toro, gaining about sixty pounds since his Usual Suspects
days) getting stoned out of their minds and trashing hotel rooms virtually
beyond recognition? That is the plot in it's entirety. Along the way,
though, they do encounter a variety of characters (played mostly by
celebrities in quick cameos), including Gary Busey as a "lonely" (hehe)
highway patrol officer and Cameron Diaz as a woman who has Del Toro
convinced that she is in love with him merely because they made eye
contact. 
I've been told that the novel from which this was based (written by Hunter
S. Thompson - one of the supposedly cool beatnik authors that I have yet to
be acquainted with) is so weird and bizarre that it would be almost
un-filmable using any conventional film concepts and techniques. I've also
been told by some that have seen this movie that it is pretty much a direct
translation of the novel, complete with alot of cool narration. So
shouldn't we be giving Gilliam at least some credit for filming a story
that was thought to be so odd that it could not be put on celluloid? Even
if you don't dig the movie, you at least have to admire that. 
One one of the many strong points of Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas that I
forgot to mention earlier is the awesome as hell soundtrack that the film
features. If you want to hear what is probably the best movie soundtrack
since Reservoir Dogs, featuring such mind-altering tunes as "White Rabbit",
"One Toke Over the Line" and "Get Together", I strongly urge you to buy a
copy of the CD (I'm listening to it as I type, as a matter of fact). 
I know it's going to sound odd for me to say this about what is basically
just a drug trip in movie form, but I seriously doubt that you will see
very many films come out this year that are as good as this one. It's that
well made. 

Author
Jerry Saravia
I have always wondered what it would be like to make a film about two drug
addicts who do nothing more than consume drugs through an entire movie. Okay,
that would be Cheech and Chong's "Up in Smoke," but that was a comedy. "The
Doors" was about an unlikable, boorish addict who got high on the idea of
death. You might also think of the superbly giddy "Boogie Nights," which showed
more scenes of drug use than any movie ever made. That is until I saw the
wildly off-balance spectacle of Terry Gilliam's "Fear and Loathing in Las
Vegas," a putrid, excessive assault on the senses. Excess doesn't even begin to
describe this odyssey. This is more like enduring a bad road trip while stuck
in New York City traffic. The scenery may be nice, but it's hell to sit
through.
On the basis of Hunter S. Thompson's cult novel, the adventurous Johnny Depp
plays the bald-headed journalist (known here as Raoul Duke) who goes to Las
Vegas to cover a story on the Mint 400, a desert motorcycle race. Thompson
brings his Samoan attorney, Lazlo, also known as Dr. Gonzo, to Vegas. Duke is
less interested in the race, though, than in smashing up hotel rooms - an eerie
reminder of Depp's own real-life tabloid tales. In the trunk of their car, they
carry every drug known to man, including uppers, downers, laughers, acid,
mescaline - you name it, they got it. They start seeing visions of reptiles,
giant bats, faces morphing into weird shapes, raging demons and other grotesque
hallucinations. And it was around this point that I started to lose interest in
the movie. 
Don't get me wrong. I have no problem with films showing the abuse of drugs and
the effects of excessive consumption. "Trainspotting" was one film that showed
the pleasure and the danger of heroin addiction yet it was instilled with a
sense of purpose and a sense of humanity. "Fear and Loathing..." is basically
about addiction, but it does not reveal much about the addicts. To put it
another way, the depiction of drug use is all on the surface, and there's no
theme underneath to support it. The histrionic performances do not help the
one-sided material. 
Depp is a gifted, talented actor but his interpretation of Duke is reduced to a
series of tics, double-takes and wild-eyed nausea. He doesn't even seem to be a
journalist, and comes across more as a caricature (occasionally depicted in the
Doonesbury comics) with no inner surface or humanity. He's a drug freak,
nothing more. 
The same can be said for Benicio Del Toro as the extremely wasted Dr. Gonzo (a
name more applicable to Thompson) who doesn't do much with his role except yell
countless obscenities while emoting a singularly angry expression throughout.
Another detriment to this actor is his constant muttering - I couldn't grasp
one syllable of what he said. Clarity and nuance are not exactly in Del Toro's
vocabulary.
The best moments in "Fear and Loathing..." are the comic set pieces, such as
Duke's inability to avoid paying for his hotel room; Gonzo's hilarious attempt
to convince an underage girl (Christina Ricci) that he's being watched by the
FBI; a scared blond hitchhiker (Tobey Maguire) who runs away from the duo; and
the pičce de résistance: a drug enforcement conference where the Duke is
ingesting LSD instead of covering the event for his paper.
One of the quietest scenes in the film featuring a dour Ellen Barkin as a diner
waitress who harbors a certain contempt towards customers, including the
leering Dr. Gonzo. It's a terrific scene, flawlessly timed and edited, but what
does it have to do with the rest of the movie? 
There are some clever cameos by other actors including James Woods, Mark
Harmon, Lyle Lovett and, best of all, Gary Busey as a lonely highway cop who
asks Duke for a kiss. In the end, they are part of a menagerie of trivial,
witless sequences with no structure or meaning. Somehow, none of this resembles
Thompson's prose. 
"Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" is directed by Terry Gilliam (Twelve Monkeys),
a former Monty Python comic, who is best known for his bizarre, overrated film,
"Brazil." Gilliam's main problem in past directorial efforts was his tendency
to waver from one extreme visual cue to another. It worked for "Twelve Monkeys"
but it was detrimental in "Time Bandits." Perhaps, he is the perfect director
for Thompson's surreal novel - the film is shot with extreme wide-angle lenses
that greatly distort the reality on screen. Thompson, however, didn't just
emphasize distorting reality. He also wanted us to see the world through his
eyes, including the "fear and loathing" of living and searching for something
in the 1970's. All we really get in this film is the distortion.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, comments or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ellen Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron
Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Christina
Ricci, Katherine Helmond, Michael Jeter, Penn Jillette, Lyle Lovett,
Harry Dean Stanton, Tim Thomerson
Written by: Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies and Alex Cox
Based on the novel by: Hunter S. Thompson
Directed by: Terry Gilliam
Running Time: 128 minutes
Understand that I know absolutely nothing about Hunter S. Thompson or
his work.  Also understand that I have no desire to
research him or his work in order to write this review.  That having
been said, let's begin...
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is just a ridiculous mess.  It has it's
good moments, but ultimately infuriates the viewer for
having no point whatsoever.  The film is similar to 1980's Where the
Buffalo Roam where Bill Murray played rebellious writer
Hunter S. Thompson and Peter Boyle was his whacked-out attorney.  Here
it's Johnny Depp as Thompson and Benicio Del
Toro as his whacked-out attorney.  Where the Buffalo Roam skipped right
over the events of this film, and wisely so.  The
events in Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas consist of nothing more that
Depp and Del Toro using drugs, stumbling around,
hallucinating, retreating to a hotel room, doing more drugs, stumbling
around, hallucinating, and so on and so on.
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas isn't telling us a story, and it isn't
trying to say anything.  It's just one long drug trip.  It's mildly
amusing for a while, and does provide a few chuckles, but it quickly
wears thin.  Depp is good playing yet another odd
character, but Benecio Del Toro again gets on my nerves here.  Whenever
I see him on screen (in movies like The Fan and
The Usual Suspects) I feel like I need subtitles to understand him.  Add
drunken slurs to his normal unintelligible dialogue and I
can't understand one single syllable he utters.
The film just seems to raise questions that would be interesting to see
addresses, but of course the film is more interested in
obscure drug trips than anything coherent.  For example, who is hiring
Thompson to write articles for them?  Why would
anyone tolerate that kind of behavior?  And also, who can live their
life like this?  How can someone consistantly wake up
surrounded and covered in filth, not knowing what has happened for the
last two hours or so, and then want to do it all over
again?  Come to think of it, that sounds a lot like how I felt after
seeing this movie.  Thankfully, I have enough sense to know
that I'd never want that to happen again.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   No other film this year has divided critics and general
audience alike as much as "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas." 
Negative criticism including comments like "if you can possibly
avoid seeing this movie, do," and "does not translate well
from book to screen" and "just one damn event after another." 
Positive input included comments like "at least as hilarious as
the book," "an absolute hoot," and "Johnny Depp and Benicio
del Toro play off against each other better than Don Quixote
and Sancho Panza."
   The nays have it.  Hunter S. Thompson's classic 1971 book
about a hip journey into the square American dream may
have been required reading on many college campuses,
holding for itself the status that J.D. Salinger enjoyed with
"Catcher in the Rye."  The screen version is something else,
principally since the chief attribute of the book--the way the
narrator keeps you reading relentlessly ahead by his dense
verbiage--comes across visually in a fragmented course.  The
movie is really just one scene after other, giving the
impression that each tableau could form the basis of a
separate narrative, but the images just do not gel as
segments of a 128-minute work. Johnny Depp's off-the-wall
performance is a one-note business.  Dangling a cigarette in
a holder as though he were developing an antenna to
communicate to the world, he is so unable to speak in a
coherent voice that the narration by another actor is essential. 
Given his body's penchant to be an entire pharmaceutical
company, his use of tobacco comes across as overkill. 
Benicio Del Toro does a more complex job as the overweight
Samoan attorney (he is a Chicano in the book), repeating the
injunction "speaking as your attorney I must advise you..."
each time launching into counsel that makes you sympathize
with Shakespeare's recommendation, "First let's kill all the
lawyers."
   "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" is about a journalist,
Raoul Duke, who in the late sixties is disappointed in the way
America is heading and disgusted with the leadership of
President Nixon.  He defensively develops an affinity for
drugs, which he considers "hip." His are the people who will
bring about a greening of America by trashing the absurd
squareness of the silent majority.  Heading with his attorney,
Dr. Gonzo (Benicio del Toro), to cover a motorbike race for
Sports Illustrated, he decides that the best journalistic truth
comes from fiction--from a disposition to hype what the
reporter finds in order to highlight its meaning.  As the two
men drive from L.A. to Las Vegas, the home of the American
Dream with its icon, the impossibly square Debbie Reynolds,
they proceed to trash their hotel rooms, skip out without
paying their bills, and generally subvert the culture of the
square by living close to the edge.
   Thanks to special effects technology, director Terry Gilliam
(of Monty Python fame) is able to illustrate much of the
hallucinogenic images conjured up by the disillusioned Raoul. 
In the most highly publicized scene, Raoul visits the lobby of
a large Las Vegas hotel filled with the square, those who
eschew psychedelic drugs in favor of the martini.  The tourists
turn into lizards who, in Raoul's imagination, are not engaged
in civilized banter but rather are a sad bunch of Godzilla-like
creatures smacking their lips in banal, animalistic and
meaningless chatter.  In yet another scene, one involving a
convention of district attorneys discussing the subject of
dangerous drugs, director Gilliam makes good use of Michael
Jeter, who describes the evils of the weed without believing a
word he says--as though he were telling his audience of law
enforcement officials that the convention is a farce and that
they're all there to play the roulette wheel, not to insure that
the nation goes sober.
   Two scenes are almost an embarrassment: one in which
Dr. Gonzo introduces Raoul to Lucy, a jail-bait pickup played
by Christina Ricci who has latched on to the much older man;
and another featuring an almost unrecognizable Ellen Barkin
as a waitress in a greasy spoon who realizes too late that she
should not have stood up to these two psychedelic guys, one
of whom threatens her life with a huge hunting knife.
   Hunter S. Thompson's book, which is classified as non-
fiction, is a frenzied description of his own trip to the American
Dream, the author himself later becoming as muddled as his
Raoul and who, like J.D. Salinger, retreated from the world to
a remote village.  Terry Gilliam, who, like the writer enjoyed
his own peak of success but later dwindled and faded, has
been unable to realize Thompson's point of view--to depict the
world of hip America just before the great disllusionment.  You
leave the theater wondering why the most intelligent guy in
Danny Boyle's movie "Trainspotting" tells us "imagine your
best orgasm and then multiply it by one thousand" to describe
the pleasures of illegal drugs.  What is the great pleasure
attached to watching the hotel floor shimmy and shake, your
best friend turn into a Mephistophelean buffalo, and tourists in
a cocktail party turning into lizards?

Author
Michael Marris
What they don't tell you when you when you front the counter to buy your
tickets for this film is that the price includes a two hour hit of movie
mescaline.
So you never did drugs in the 60s? The 70s? Not even the 80s? Worry not. Now
in the 90s this movie is as good as, or better than, the real thing. And you
won't get busted.
This is a time warp film, designed to light up the remaining brain cells of
baby boomers with memories of all that social anarchy and chaos that
characterised the late 60s and early 70s. Gen Xers seeing this movie however
will probably continue to be quite mystified about what exactly the olden
days were like.
This film is not a story. It is an experience. There is no plot. A few
circumstances form a flimsy backbone for a few drug crazed days, mostly in
Las Vegas. The film is utterly faithful to the book by Hunter S Thompson.
Johnny Depp is utterly faithful to the spirit of the lead character, Raoul
Duke.  Benicio Del Toro taking the off lead as Duke's equally drug riddled
attorney Dr Gonzo is also true to his part. Terry Gilliam as director brings
in the best excesses from his days involved with the hallucinogenic Monthy
Python team.
But this film is something more than a drug riddled orgy of carnage and
destruction. It is also a pithy social documentary, focussed on the late 60s
but equally relevant to the late 90s. It is a sick view of a sick society.
In both a literal and metaphorical sense Fear and Loathing is an acid
commentary on the worst excesses, not only of drug taking, but of social
existence.
The two lead characters are quite obviously sick, depraved, drug crazed
animals, by any reasonable construction. They are never seen in anything
other than a totally wasted condition, and invariably behaving in the most
outrageous antisocial manner imaginable. They have a briefcase loaded with
every conceivable drug, all of which are swilled down with copious amounts
of alcohol. The entire film is shot through their eyes and hallucinations
abound as the special Fx team morphs the carnage that is their external
reality into the bizarre visions that reflect their drug induced internal
reality.
However  and here is where this film is so really outstanding  every other
character, every other scene, every other circumstance in the movie is also
a circus side-show or a freak attraction. The essential difference is that
all these other bizarre cameos all reflect an ordinary reality, uncoloured
by the Hunter S Thompson orgy of drugs. As such they are, by and large,
taken as unremarkable. It is only when this other kaleidoscope of human
freaks and weird events is juxtaposed against the lush technicolour
hallucinations of the two lead characters that the blurring between drug
induced fantasy and everyday reality becomes so obvious. The distinction
becomes impossible to detect.
Without exception every secondary character in this movie is a freak of one
kind or another. They are social misfits, they are physically abnormal, they
are distorted personalities or, as in the case of the DA Convention Against
Hard Drugs where every participant is seen with a cigarette hanging out of
his mouth, they are living contradictions of any notion of sense and
normality. Even Hunter S Thompson plays a cameo role  fortunately for cult
followers as yet another social freak masquerading as Mr Ordinary.
The setting for most of the movie is Las Vegas  a classic freak show
environment of its own. Utterly segregated by both physical location and its
inherent raison d'etre from any ordinary reality, this isolated city in the
desert offers the perfect surreal platform from where the two lead
characters can wreak most of their own hallucinogenic carnage.
This movie is rich in many ways. It is rich in its filming and its
execution. It is rich in its pace and  short of walking out -  the viewer
has no option but to go along for his own two hours of drug induced madness.
It is rich in characterisation and totally over the top. It is rich in
special Fx and it is rich in its ironic view of straight society. It is as
enthusiastically politically incorrect as one would expect from all of its
other excesses.
As every bit as much as this is a film of its time, Fear And Loathing is
also a film of this time. Little has changed about the freak show that
constitutes much of the fringes of our society, and which we somehow have
come to accept quite uncritically. It is only when the acerbic lens of this
movie is trained upon the absurdities and paradoxes with which we all more
or less peacefully coexist that we realise how fine the line between madness
and sanity really is. Importantly, as well, how impossible it is to actually
know where that line is drawn. Not to mention on what side of it we each
stand.

Author
Jason Overbeck
There was once a time when drugs were funny, Cheech and Chong are living
proof of this.  I was reminded of this as I watched Thompson's alter ego
Raoul Duke (Depp) and his lawyer Dr. Gonzo (Del Toro) try to walk into a
hotel on a psychedelic mix of acid, mescaline, ether, cocaine, and
alcohol.  Seeing Depp react as a hotel lobby lady's face distorts and
contorts into a ghastly beast and wondering if you have to be on drugs
to think the Casino carpets are weird.  The first half of this film has
many such laughs.
Depp and Del Toro are on an assignment in Las Vegas in search of a story
they never follow up, and mostly staying high on drugs and trashing
everything in their path.  Depp talks with longing of San Francisco
"great" acid trips and his cigarette holder dangling from his lips while
his equally strung out lawyer gives his professional advise like, "As
your lawyer I suggest you take two hits out of the brown case." 
The film's look is that of a frenzied trip.  Wide lenses and distortions
in showing Las Vegas and the hallucinations the characters have while
looking at everyday objects.  The cinematography is off the wall, wacky
as the camera spins out of control with the characters.  Different
lighting and colored editing processes are also used generously to
compliment the acting and unusual state of mind required.
There is one moment of pure genius as Thompson drives down the road at
an incredible rate after consuming mass of drugs and skipping on his
hotel bill.  A highway patrolman flashes his lights and pulls up to him
telling him to pull over.  Instead he leads him on a chase while playing
with the expectations of the cop and narrating that it gives the cop
some excitement and he would prefer chasing him rather than him getting
nervous and pulling over immediately.  This leads to a huge laugh.
I don't know how the public will react to this film.  The critics seem
to love it or hate it and the constant drug use is raising some
controversy and hatred towards the film.  I am giving the film a
marginal recommendation but the film is definitely not for everyone and
may rely on if you think drugs are or could be funny.  Those not
familiar with the book or Thompson may have trouble deciphering the
action.  Others can sit back and expect to see a wacky film that will
have you see the world in a frenzied light for hours after.

Author
Ben Hoffman
This is a film you will either loathe (The title tells it all) or
love.   Put me down for the former.  Despite being based on Hunter
S. Thompson's very popular 1970s book that swept through all the
colleges, Terry Gilliam erred in trying to make it into a movie. The
results are disastrous.
In the 1970s, bad things were happening all over our country;  our
students were in a turmoil.    Drugs were in.  Even respectable
professors told their students that LSD was harmless and would broaden
their lives, give inspiration to artists.  So it was that many got
stoned and stayed that way for years with dropping out of school
becoming a frequent occurrence.
This film is about that era and about two who lived through that period.
The film's problem is that every scene is nothing more than a
duplicate of what went before: drugs taken to excess, the effects
never allowed to wear off, disgusting uninhibited behavior by both
principal characters.    To indicate that would have been fine; to
show every moment of their miserable lives, in detail, becomes too
obnoxiously boring.
I have been an admirer of Johnny Depp as an actor since first seeing
him in the wonderful "WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE" (the same film that
had Leonardo di Caprio in a great performance as a retarded young
man).   Here Depp is Raoul Duke, a sportswriter.   Depp is outlandishly
terrific as the stoned writer but after an hour of the same, the
excitement he engendered began to pall.  There is a limit to how much
one can take of repetitive acting with only changes in the scenery,
the location.
Duke rides to Las Vegas with his fat-bellied attorney, Dr. Gonzo,
(Benicio del Toro) to Las Vegas.   Again, what starts out as weirdly
funny soon slows to a halt.  Is Dr. Gonzo, belly protruding through
his open shirt while he lies clothed in a water-filled bathtub, funny?
I think not.
Director Terry Gilliam has made some very entertaining films (Time
Bandits, The Adventures of the Baron Munchausen, The Fisher King, 12
Monkeys . . . and more) but Fear and Loathing In Las Vegas is not one
of them.

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1998
U.S. Release Date: 5/22/98 (wide)
Running Length: 2:05
MPAA Classification: R (Drugs, grotesqueness, vomit, profanity)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Christina Ricci, Gary Busey, 
      Ellen Barkin
Director: Terry Gilliam
Producers: Patrick Cassavetti, Laila Nabulsi
Screenplay: Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies, and Alex Cox, 
      based on the novel by Hunter S. Thompson
Cinematography: Nicola Pecorini
Music: Ray Cooper
U.S. Distributor: Universal Pictures
     It's too bad the title THE GOOD, THE BAD, AND THE UGLY was already 
taken, because it would have been the perfect moniker for FEAR AND 
LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS, Terry Gilliam's adaptation of Hunter S. 
Thompson's book (emphasis on "the bad and the ugly" part).  It's always 
a risky endeavor to fashion a motion picture based on an "unfilmable" 
novel -- even to try demands a director with a lion's share of chutzpah.  
Gilliam, the American member of the Monty Python troupe, certainly has 
that quality, but his efforts here have met with what can charitably be 
called mixed results.  From time-to-time, FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS 
is darn funny, but those moments of seemingly-inspired humor are more 
than offset by the rest of the movie, which is nearly unwatchable.
     The film's plot is thin, but then the book, which is a stream-of-
consciousness affair, is more interested in making pithy observations 
and developing a tone than in presenting a narrative.  One thing Gilliam 
does well is to capture Thompson's style and unleash it on the screen.  
However, I'm not sure that's a good thing.  After all, there is a reason 
why books are books and movies are movies, and FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS 
VEGAS makes a pretty good case that the two don't always mix.
     Back to the storyline:  Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp), who is a 
fictional representation of the book's protagonist, author Thompson, is 
headed to Las Vegas in the company of his "Samoan lawyer," Dr. Gonzo 
(Benicio Del Toro, looking more bloated than Robert De Niro in the 
closing moments of RAGING BULL).  The year is 1971, and Duke's 
ostensible reason for the journey is to cover the $50,000 Mint 400 
Desert Race, but his real motivation seems to be to see how many Vegas 
hotel rooms he can trash and how many different concoctions of grass, 
cocaine, alcohol, uppers, mescaline, and acid he can imbibe.  After 
being attacked by hallucinatory bats during the trek across the desert, 
the pair arrives on the strip before the end of the first reel, checks 
into their room, and spends the rest of the movie getting stoned and 
taking the audience on a bizarre visual journey that would make Oliver 
Stone proud.
     I'm sure the idea of the film is to give the viewer the sense of 
inhabiting Duke's shoes -- that's what all the weird angles, distorted 
shots, and red lighting are for.  However, being in a theater watching a 
couple of wasted characters is not anything like being under the 
influence of a mind-altering drug (or so I'm told).  It doesn't take 
long for the movie-goer to recognize all of the visual trickery as a 
gimmick designed to camouflage the fact that the film doesn't go 
anywhere:  the plot is repetitious and the protagonist is a lifeless 
caricature.
     In this picture, the narrator has more lines than the characters.  
This is one of those rare movies when the technique of having a narrator 
works, primarily because every amusing or insightful comment made during 
the far-too-long running length is contained in the voiceover.  Here's 
where we learn that the message behind FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS is 
to illustrate how 1971 was a turning point in the drug culture -- the 
year that the innocence and empowerment of the late '60s turned rancid, 
leaving users burned-out and broken instead of free and flying high.  As 
one might expect, Gilliam also takes a few corrosive shots at middle-
class America.  The most obvious of these occurs during the film's 
funniest sequence:  an anti-drug "information session" attended by Duke, 
Gonzo, and dozens of white bread, out-of-uniform cops.
     Johnny Depp is the kind of actor who always seems willing to try 
something new.  During his uneven career, he has played everything from 
Edward Scissorhands to Donnie Brasco.  As Duke, Depp gives a wonderful 
physical performance with no emotional depth.  He has the rubber-legged 
actions of his character right ("a total loss of motor skills... a loss of 
communication with the spinal column"), but doesn't give us any reason 
to care about Duke.  He's like Steve Martin in THE JERK, only much, much 
less inspired.  Meanwhile, the most impressive thing about Benicio Del 
Toro is how thoroughly he manages to hide his good looks beneath hair, 
rolls of fat, and drying bodily fluids.  Christina Ricci, the excellent 
young actress who is continuing her quest to re-shape her image from 
cute to tawdry (see also THE ICE STORM, and the yet-to-be-released 
BUFFALO 66 and THE OPPOSITE OF SEX), has a small role as an artist 
named Lucy.  There are other cameos as well, including Gary Busey, Ellen 
Barkin, Mark Harmon, and Cameron Diaz.
     One criticism that has been leveled against FEAR AND LOATHING IN 
LAS VEGAS is that it glorifies drug use.  I'm not sure how anyone who 
has seen the film can make that statement, since the movie reduces 
chronic users to the level of barely-functional zombies awash in 
degeneracy.  Gilliam has said that his intention was to make the film 
"ugly," and he has achieved that aim.  Visually and viscerally, there is 
a connection between FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS and TRAINSPOTTING, 
albeit with two critical differences:  the British picture developed 
real characters and didn't go on and on and on, ad nauesum, like this 
one.  
     While I'm not recommending the movie to anyone interested in either 
(a) mainstream entertainment, or (b) something with a coherent 
narrative, the film has the look and feel of a picture that's destined 
for cult status.  It's the kind of movie that plays at midnight showings 
during film festivals and generates a small-but-devoted legion of fans 
who attend conventions and boast about how many hundreds of times 
they've watched it.  Ultimately, however, while this die-hard group will 
call Gilliam a genius and genuflect every time his name is mentioned, 
the rest of us will recall the movie version of FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS 
VEGAS as a bad trip.
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
"Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" is one of the worst movies by a
director of significance that I have ever seen.  It's shameful that
such an amazing book could be transformed -- by an excellent director --
 into a movie of such appalling emptiness and shapelessness.  It's not
even a good lousy movie.  More below the belt than that I can't get.
Ostensibly drawn from Hunter S. Thompson's seminal work of the same
name, "Fear and Loathing" gives us Raoul (Johnny Depp, unrecognizable
and damn near incoherent with that cigarette holder wedged in his
mouth) and Gonzo (Benicio del Toro) as drug-addled journalists who have
allegedly been sent to cover a bike race out near Vegas.  They stick
around after that to also examine (if that's the word) a convention of
district attorneys, and take drugs.  Lots of drugs.
I quote: "We had two bags of grass, seventy-five pellets of mescaline,
five sheets of high-powered blotter acid, a salt shaker half-full of
cocaine and a whole galaxy of multicolored uppers, downers, screamers,
laughers... also a quart of tequila, a quart of rum, a case of beer, a
pint of raw ether, and two dozen amyls. But the only thing that worried
me was the ether. There is nothing more irresponsible and depraved than
a man in the depths of an ether binge, and I knew we would be getting
into that rotten stuff sooner or later."
Raoul and Gonzo consume most of this chemical smorgasbord through the
course of the movie, and the audience is forced to watch the results.
At first there is the hint of something wicked going on, like when they
try to con their way into a Debbie Reynolds performance by giving the
usher a toot, but then the same pattern is repeated, without any real
variation or insight, until we are left with something that cannot even
be watched for more than a few minutes at a time without cringing.
What we have is not so much a movie about drugs as it is a movie that
simply contains drugs.  There's no point of view, no insight, and not a
hint of wit or genuine examination of character.  There is just Raoul
and Gonzo getting into one stoned mess after another.  Cheech and Chong
used to make movies like this, too, but the saving grace was that they
were intermittently funny.  "Fear and Loathing" isn't.
Much noise has been made about "Fear and Loathing" being a dissection
of "Straight" America during the dog-end of the Sixties.  Horse
manure.  Gilliam does this by ineptly throwing some stock footage of
Sixties protests at us, and by having everyone in the movie who's
an "Establishment" person be an asshole.  But Raol and Duke are
scarcely any less assholes themselves, so what's the point?
I like Gilliam as a director; every now and then he pulls himself
together for a really virtuoso movie like "12 Monkeys."  Here, he was
apparently drafted in after the original director, Alex Cox, left; I
suspect Cox, whose movies include the amazing "Repo Man", would have
been able to REALLY make something scary and anarchic out of this
material.  In Gilliam's hands, what we have is barely even intelligible
as a movie.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Nicholas Kleszczewski
It's hard to write about this film without recognizing the harsh divisions in
the critical community about it.  It's proponents say that it is a
tremendously faithful adaptation of Hunter S. Thompson's book.  Its detractors
say that the book does not work as cinema, or that the book is dated.  Let it
be said that on this point I'm on the side of the proponents: a film cannot be
faulted by the material it's based upon.  Let the patron decide if the
material suits him/her.
That said, and admitting that I did not read Thompson's journal about his drug
binges in this one pivotal weekend in 1971, part of me enjoyed _Fear and
Loathing_ in much the same way I enjoyed _2001, A Space Odyssey_.  The key to
enjoying both films is to set your brain aside, forget any notions of plot,
and let the images take over.  In its own quirky-but-deadpan way, _Fear and
Loathing_ accomplishes just that.
In particular, I enjoyed some of the early sequences: the hitchhiker, the
hotel, the cocktail lounge.  I also enjoyed some of the juicy cameos, such as
Christina Ricci and Gary Busey.  Johnny Depp plays Thompson's alter-ego,
"Duke" with the one-note cartoonishness similar to that of Ed Wood.
Plumped-up Benecio Del Toro did an even more exemplary job playing Duke's
comrade "lawyer" Dr. Gonzo, who at times turns intensely violent.
It is in these violent (along with downer) stretches, that the film begins to
drag.  I suppose that it's morally strong to include the results of the drug
binges, such as the extended rage sequences in the hotel room, or the nauseous
merry-go-round sequence in a Circus -based entertainment center.  It
accomplished what it was supposed to: when I was to feel nauseous, I felt
nauseous.  When I was to feel a sense of terror, I felt that too.  These
experiences happen intermittently throughout, and the audience has to wonder
at these junctures if the storytelling arc couldn't have been improved.
As a point of contrast, take the best OD movie scene in recent memory:  Pulp
Fiction. when Mia OD's on heroin, the audience felt that sense of terror and
comedy intermingled together, that built and built until the final stab of a
punchline came through.  One person got a heartattack watching that at the NY
Film festival. After the sequence, drugs are not mentioned again.  It's point
was made.  Move on.
Contrast that with Fear and Loathing:  there's better imagery in the latter,
but the timing is off.  It speeds, it dazzles, it exhilirates, then it gets
dizzying, nauseous, terrifying, and embarrassing, only to begin again. This is
one of those cases where I think it will play better on television, because
the commercials will break up the constant action, and its little vigniettes
can work as chapters that stand on their own.
Back to Depp's Duke.   Material like this is unique in itself, and it is a
plus, to some extent, that his deadpan narration is guiding us through the
film.  Which works and doesn't.  I found a liking to Thompson's writing, and
the matter-of-fact way he speaks of seeing bats and man-eating carpets.
What's missing (and I wouldn't know how to resolve this) is a human element.
Why risk throwing your whole career away on your addiction?  The film touches
upon reasons: Vietnam, dissatisfaction with society, the desire to push
yourself as far to the edge without crossing it.  But it's too cartoonish to
be taken seriously.
Maybe it's the timing.  The just seen _Ice Storm_ is still fresh in my mind,
and tackles this with far greater efficiency than whatever special effects
Gilliam provides.
So it's a mixed bag.  I enjoyed much of the film, but not quite enough to
recommend it.  You know who you are.  If you appreciated the anti-politically
correct, pro-drug book, then you're bound to enjoy the movie.  And shame on
you.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Rick Ferguson
Starring Johnny Depp and Benicio del Toro
Written by Alex Cox, Tod Davies, Terry Gilliam and Tony Grisoni
I've always preferred mushrooms to blotter acid. Dropping acid is like 
riding a roller coaster blindfolded; you have no idea where the peaks 
and valleys are, no idea when the next terrifying decent will send your 
stomach into your throat, and no idea how long the ride will last. Then 
there's the hard knot in your gut and the clenched teeth that come 
with ingesting a strychnine-laced dose. Mushrooms, on the other hand, 
offer the psychedelic equivalent of a leisurely ride on a Ferris wheel: 
a steady, reassuring assent, a short period of thrilling motion and 
color, and then a smooth landing. Acid is for daredevils; mushrooms are 
for refined seekers of joy.
My point is that in FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS, director Terry 
Gilliam has made an acid movie, when I wish he would have made a 
mushroom movie. Full of shocking sight gags, aggressive images and 
grotesque comic performances, the film certainly offers something for 
those fans of Hunter S. Thompson's book who want to experience its 
twisted pharmacological world-view from the inside out. But for those of 
us who just want to enjoy a well-made film, Gilliam has produced a mixed 
bag.
FEAR AND LOATHING tells the ostensibly true story of how self-professed 
"gonzo" journalist Hunter S. Thompson (Johnny Depp) and Hispanic 
activist attorney Oscar Zeta Actosta (Benicio Del Toro), came to Las 
Vegas to cover a motorcycle race and found themselves trapped in the 
middle of a District Attorney's convention while ingesting every 
conceivable drug available to a man of means in 1971. Operating under 
the pseudonyms of "Raoul Duke" and "Dr. Gonzo", the two men careen into 
Vegas on an acid and mescaline bender, then hole up in a hotel suite to 
binge on amyl nitrite, cocaine, tequila and a rainbow of multi-colored 
uppers and downers. They terrorize every one they meet, mostly because 
every one they meet terrifies them. Duke hallucinates giant bats on the 
way into town, then is attacked by horrifying lizards in the casino 
lounge. Dr. Gonzo becomes enamored of a thick-bladed hunting knife and 
begs Duke to throw the tape player into the bathtub with him just as 
Jefferson Airplane's "White Rabbit" reaches its climax. And these guys 
don't just trash hotel rooms - they rape them, humiliate them and 
leave them for dead. That neither of them ends up dead or in jail is 
testament to blind luck or Providence, depending on your point of view.
Thompson's book, besides being a hilarious read, has stood the test of 
time as an important historical document. It simultaneously exposed the 
60's drug culture for the sham that it was and exposed Las Vegas as 
the place where the American Dream came to die. Pontificate all you want 
about how the film illustrates Thompson's message, but the truth is 
that, stripped to its bare essentials, what Gilliam has wrought is a 
drug comedy. It's a Cheech and Chong movie. You're there to watch 
Depp and del Toro ingest a lot of chemicals and then laugh at the 
results: see Johnny take drugs, see Johnny fall down.
There's nothing wrong with this concept, but Gilliam tries too hard. 
This is a frantic movie - all sweaty close-ups, wide-angle lenses, 
Dutch tilts and other-worldly lighting schemes. There are times when 
Gilliam really does put a convincing representation of an acid trip on 
the screen. But to what end? Much of the dialogue comes verbatim from 
Thompson's book, and there are some priceless comic observations. But 
you're hard pressed to hear or digest them amidst all the jumbled 
camera work. This brings us to the performances, which strike me as all 
wrong. Depp plays Thompson as Groucho Marks filtered through George C. 
Scott in PATTON - a gimmicky performance which works against the biting 
satire of Thompson's dialogue. In between his several puking scenes, 
Del Toro fares better as Dr. Gonzo, but he also mumbles and sputters so 
many of his lines that their weight is lost. Watching these two made me 
wish that the movie had been made twenty years ago, with Dan Akroyd and 
John Belushi as the leads - now that would have been something to see.
It's interesting to note that Alex Cox, credited as a co-writer on the 
screenplay, was originally slated to direct before Gilliam took over. As 
much of a fan as I am of Gilliam's work, Cox would have been the 
better choice. SID AND NANCY, Cox's best work, covered essentially the 
same subject matter, but Cox was able to pull back and allow the 
characters of Sid Vicious and Nancy Spungen to carry the film. Gilliam 
commits the compound sin of over-directing his film while being 
uncertain of his purpose. What kind of movie was he trying to make, 
anyway? It doesn't try to be a cautionary tale, and it doesn't work 
as broad comedy. If he had considered more carefully his purpose, the 
result would have been a much more interesting film. But I don't want 
to be too hard on it. There are some truly funny moments, and if 
you're in a good enough mood you might get a kick out of it. I do, 
however, recommend watching FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS under the 
influence of your favorite controlled substance - I guarantee it will 
enhance the effect.
Please visit the Film Geek web site at:

Author
Berge Garabedian
Film adaptation of Hunter S. Thompson's infamous semi-autobiographical
hallucinogen-fueled book of the same title. Director Terry Gilliam of
TWELVE MONKEYS (8/10) and BRAZIL (7/10) fame, took over the helm of
this project after fellow director Alex Cox (SID AND NANCY (7.5/10))
"apparently alienated everyone associated with the movie", according to
Gilliam.
PLOT:
Writer Thompson (Depp) heads down to Las Vegas with his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Del Toro) to cover a motorcycle race. During their trip, they
systematically consume "two bags of grass, seventy-five pellets of
mescaline, five sheets of high powered blotter acid, a salt shaker
half-full of cocaine, a whole galaxy of multi-colored uppers, downers,
screamers, laughers, a quart of tequila, a quart of rum, a case of
beer, a pint of raw ether and two dozen amyls. The movie presents us
with the results of that heavy drug use.
CRITIQUE:
I have given this movie two separate ratings because I believe that the
enjoyment of this psychedelic picture is highly correlated with the
amount of drugs or alcohol that would be floating around in the
viewer's own mind, whilst inhaling this cinematic vision of excess. If
you are prepared to get high or intoxicated before watching this film,
I would say that this is one picture that you will thoroughly enjoy on
a multitude of colorful levels. If, on the other hand, you decide to
stray from the addition of nefarious elements to your system, I could
not imagine you truly appreciating much of this drug-induced picture's
entire ride (5.5/10 for all those sober dogs). Note: I have not read
Thompson's book.
Having said that, JoBlo did engage in an alcohol-based consumatory
session before (and during) the viewing of this film, so his critique
of the film should be appreciated on that level. This movie relies
heavily on style and peculiar humour, rather than substance or plot. It
moves admirably from one scene to the next, without much basis of their
being, while presenting us with the two days in the life of writer
Hunter S. Thompson during which he seemed to consume more drugs and
alcohol than anyone could ever imagine. It was 1971, and the times were
apparently "a' changing" in the States.
Johnny Depp chews into his role like an overgrown child sucking on a
chocolate lollipop. During the filming, Depp apparently become fast
friends with real-life writer Thompson, and was known to wander off the
set from time to time, for the sake of checking out the newest barmaid
at the local watering hole. I thought he did seem to exaggerate his
walk a little bit too much, but then again, this movie is supposed to
be a wild exaggeration of everything and anything, so who am I to talk.
The one thing that did blow my mind was the actual physical
transformation endured by actor Benicio Del Toro for his role as Dr.
Gonzo. I couldn't believe that this fat, Samoan lawyer, was the same
guy who played the slick mumbling criminal in THE USUAL SUSPECTS
(7.5/10). Word on the street is that gained over 40 pounds for this
role, and I must say that his look was deliciously reprehensible.
Plenty of cameos also pepper this kaleidoscopic moving picture in the
form of Ellen Barkin, Christina Ricci, Tobey Maguire and Cameron Diaz,
along with a bunch of others.
Other than that, the soundtrack was expectedly eclectic, the style was
not as wild as I thought it would be, and the ending was certainly not
much of a barn-burner, but then again, who really noticed. This movie
is about visions of bats floating through your head, Johnny Depp
looking goofy and being bald, and the cornucopia of drug-ravaged scenes
filling your own intoxicated system with ideas of anarchy, rebellion
and the lost American Dream. And for all those who plan on seeing this
movie without the partnership of a mean drink or a mighty doobie, I
suggest you move further down the aisle, buy yourself a ticket to
GODZILLA (6/10), and enjoy the visual fabrications manufactured for the
unstimulated mind.
Little Known Facts: 
Depp and Del Toro snorted plenty of powdered milk instead of cocaine.
Bill Murray also portrayed a Thompson-based character in the film WHERE
THE BUFFALO ROAM.
Johnny Depp turned down roles in THE THREE MUSKETEERS, SPEED (7.5/10),
and LEGENDS OF THE FALL (7.5/10), for smaller and quirkier roles in
BENNY AND JOON (6.5/10) and WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE? (7/10).
In 1988, Depp told Rolling Stone magazine that he'd tried every drug by
the age of 14.
Johnny hung out with some of the members of Oasis while filming the
uncompleted DIVINE RAPTURE in Ireland, and later played some slide
guitar on the 1997 album, Be Here Now.
Johnny was born in Kentucky, is a high-school dropout, has nicknamed
himself "Mr. Stench", has been engaged to four women until now
(including actress Winona Ryder, whose "Winona Forever" tattoo had to
be altered to "Wino forever" after their breakup), currently plays
guitar in a band called "P", and owns The Viper Room nightclub in L.A.

Author
Will Fitzhugh
Review: Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Hunter S. Thompson claims he finished some of his ground-breaking gonzo work by
ripping pages out of his notebook and feeding them directly into a fax machine,
or whatever similar device they had back in the 70's. Unfortunately it seems
like Terry Gilliam followed this model in writing the screenplay for his movie
adaptation; ripping whole pages out of a beat-up paperback edition and labeling
them "narration". I've read the book at least a dozen times but as much as I
enjoyed hearing Johnny Depp recite paragraph after paragraph of tales about
lizards roaming the halls of Las Vegas hotel or of Thompson's early, freaked-out
drug experiences, I could have gotten more or less the same thrill by soaking my
pillow with ether (those fruitflys can meet their maker tomorrow) and popping
the audio book, narrated by Sonny Bono with some amyls shoved up his nose, into
the Walkman. If those Kentucky gentleman want to vomit on their shoes, it's fine
with me; they can stagger out onto the track and get run down by sixteen pickup
truck-size thoroughbreds ridden by what look like eight-year-old kids with arms
like tennis pros and I'd be happy to just rip up my losing tickets and try it
again next race. It's probably wishful thinking, but I'd to think Alex Cox
had better ideas. Shoot, he already filmed the highway patrol scene for Repo
Man, with alien corpses instead of the hundred bars of translucent soap from the
Tropicana gift shop. Walker had the buzz of Thompson, too, except with a South
American country instead of Las Vegas.
You didn't see Irvine Welsh get all snitty when John Hodge took some characters,
about five lines and a couple of vague scene ideas from Trainspotting and pretty
much ran with it. The point is, Hodge and Danny Boyle stayed faithful to the
book without regurgitating it more or less whole. I may be stating the obvious
(but hey, this is the internet) but a book is not a movie. If some filmmakers
wants to be considered artists they need to convince us, at least occasionally,
that they made a better film than some Spielberg-worshipping drone could have.
In some cases the creative thing to do is recognize your limitations as a
screenwriter and hire somebody else to do the job. Gilliam made some good
choices, bringing his twisted Python/Brazil/Munchausen visual skills to bear,
getting some right-feeling performances out of Johnny Depp (Thompson) and
Benicio Del Toro (his bloated Samoan attorney) and not sanitizing the violence
and occasional pointlessness of the tale. But if I remember correctly from an
interview, Gilliam said that the book was pretty cinematic so he kept faithful
to it. I don't know if Thompson fed him that line over pitcher-sized rum drinks
up in Woody Creek or if he made it up himself but either way it sounds like
laziness. Or Fear. I'm just sorry it caused him to shy away from wrestling a
good screenplay, and ultimately a good movie, out of this book.
It occurred to me when this movie first came out that if Fear and Loathing in
Las Vegas was an early summer blockbuster then Gilliam/Depp/Thompson could
become a Broccoli/Connery/Bond kind of franchise. As with Ian Fleming's works,
the full-length ones (Hell's Angels, Fear And Loathing on the Campaign Trail)
would get used up first, followed by the shorter pieces (Great Shark Hunt,
Kentucky Derby), and finally new works barely inspired by newspaper columns or
notes jotted on crumpled hotel stationery. Eventually, Depp gets too old to be
convincing as a speed-crazed young journalist and gets replaced by Dennis
Hopper's grandson Victor who looks the part but can't act, lasts for one movie
and gets replaced by some relation of River Phoenix who took a few acting
lessons. Gilliam continues to attach his name to each movie even after he's
dead, his daughter taking over the directing duties. Thompson defies all odds
and lives longer than any of them, hanging around the set, muttering about rabid
hyenas in his dressing room, asking where Steadman is so he can find someone to
listen to him. Alex Cox will eventually release his own version with a British
actor who does a good American accent (Tim Roth II, Gary Oldham, Jr., that sort
of thing) and the goddamn thing will sink without a trace, an unrecognized
classic that will play a few cult theaters and resurface on college campuses
occasionally, only to be truly appreciated when distant relation of mine writes
his 100th film review for the New Yorker and names it one of the 10 best movies
of the 21st century. So far.

Author
Shane Burridge
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas  (1998)  118m.
There are always a few posers to consider when reviewing a 
long-in-coming film adaptation of a well-known book.  Should the film be 
judged without reference to its source material?  Should you read the 
book first and then view the film as its visual interpretation?  What 
about reading the book afterwards?  Should you read it at all?  
Shouldn't a film be its own peculiar entity, irrespective of its 
ancestry?
I didn't have a problem with Terry Gilliam's film of Hunter S. 
Thompson's book, but I imagine several others will.  To begin with, it's 
one of those books that are tagged 'unfilmable'.  I was in the fortunate 
position of having read 'Fear and Loathing' several years ago in high 
school, so by the time of the film version I had forgotten nearly 
everything that had happened in the book (so, I suspect, had Thompson).  
But I did remember the overall 'nothingness' of the story, which was 
enough to prepare me for the movie.  The one-sentence plot can be 
summarized thus: Two men go to Las Vegas with a suitcase full of drugs 
and spend the whole trip off their heads.  It's pointless, plotless, and 
indulgent.  It was also the birth of what became known as 'gonzo 
journalism', a sort of stream-of-consciousness reportage where the 
journo drops all pretense of trying to say anything important and 
becomes his own story.
If Hunter's book is gonzo journalism then Gilliam's film is gonzo 
cinema.  It's gleefully self-destructive.  It is Gilliam fastening his 
lance to a Chevrolet convertible and charging at the windmills with his 
foot to the floor.  But where he really nails down the film with one 
solid thwack is the way that everyone involved with the project doesn't 
seem to care about the risk they are taking.  Nothing about it is 
subtle.  The acting and directing are uninhibited to the point of being 
sophomoric.  And nobody is going to apologize.  If FEAR AND LOATHING is 
trying to simulate Thompson's similarly reckless state of mind (as it 
was in 1971) then it has to succeed on that score at least.  It 
recreates the sensation that many of its prospective audience will 
undoubtedly relate to - that when you're stoned anything and everything 
can be funny.  The opening five minutes is hysterical, but it's another 
thing to keep repeating those five minutes ad nauseum to the same 
effect.  Gilliam tries to make it as attractive as possible 
nevertheless, at least to cinema-goers, and those most interested in 
FEAR AND LOATHING will be the ones going to see its heightened pop 
colors, drunken angles, and crystal-clear depth of field on the big 
screen.  Those who are less interested will grab it off the video shelf 
and sit through forty minutes before hitting the fast-forward button.  
This film isn't made for video.  It is not meant to be controlled by the 
viewer.  It's a film that controls the viewer.  It wants to be the rush, 
and you the user.  It's what I like most about Gilliam's project; 
there's an admirable folly in making a big-budget film supposedly for 
mainstream audiences and then telling them that they're going to have to 
learn to watch films differently if we ever want to get out of the 
Hollywood rut.  David Cronenberg has been pushing this element into 
commercial cinema for years now.  When he or Gilliam get around to 
making something out of a Thomas Pynchon novel, I know we'll have 
arrived.
And in the middle of this paranoid, hallucinogenic buzz sits Johnny 
Depp, adding to his collection of oddball characters, who is left to 
provide some sort of anchor to all the disorganization around him.  
Except Depp is just as flaky as everything else in the film, so even 
that idea gets torpedoed.  If you hate Depp's bewildered performance - 
like Groucho Marx after shock treatment - then you'll be one of the 
people that walks out early, something I'm confident happens in nearly 
every screening this film has.  Maybe they didn't read the book.  Or 
maybe they did.  Or maybe they just wanted to perpetuate the concept of 
gonzo-filmgoing by buying tickets for a movie they didn't want to watch. 
 http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/profiles/sburridge.html


Author
Luke Buckmaster
REVIEW: Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Australian theatrical release date: July 16, 1998
>From 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 4 stars
Hunter S. Thompson's novel Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is bold,
outrageous and ingenious - some good ingredients for a film nowadays.
With the dynamic Johnny Depp playing a perfectly suited title role, long
time director Terry Gilliam giving his intriguing flair to the camera,
and Thompson himself being the creative consultant, the film has enough
talent involved to soar it through the roof.  Combined, they make a
swashbuckling piece - a visually extraordinary, wonderfully acted, and
shrewdly assembled flick based around the bright lights of Las Vegas.
And drugs.  And more drugs.
The film opens with a red convertible (dubbed "The Red Shark") speeding
down the highway, on the way to Las Vegas. The driver and passenger,
journalist Raoul Duke (Depp) and his Samoan attorney (Benicio Del Toro),
cannot dilly daddle - for "the sky was full of what looked like huge
bats," according to Duke.  The drugs had began to take hold.  This was
"bat country".
These two high-as-a-kite gentlemen somehow make it to their destination,
and there, they experiment with almost every drug known to man.
Marijuana, cocaine, mescaline, ether, adrenaline, and their "medicine" -
amyls.  They run amok all over the city, visiting casinos, hotels, a
dirt bike race and even a Debbie Reynolds concert.
Perhaps the most refreshing aspect of Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is
the inventive way it deals with the use of drugs.  Not exactly showing
us how bad they are, yet not completely glorifying them, the film cares
much more about showcasing the effects than preaching about the
substances themselves.  Gilliam leaves no question as to how the film's
main characters experience what they take - the film has illustrious
visuals which show, through the eyes of these characters, their world of
hallucination.  This is not an easy tactic to employ, but he does it
successfully to say the least.  Some scenes brilliantly convey this
method of film making - ranging from a bar full of lounge lizards
(literally) to an image of swooping bats in Duke's sunglasses.  They
look so real, and so impressive that viewers may start to wonder whether
they are actually seeing hallucinations themselves.
Although I once thought that Johnny Depp had found a perfectly pitched,
perfectly suited role as the Worlds Worst Director in Ed Wood, he
performs at a remarkably high level in Fear and Loathing, and seems to
be in his best form ever.  Depp should now be recognized as one of
America's finest and most diverse actors, with a range of startlingly
different films under his belt (including the race-against-time Nick of
Time, and the dramatic Mafia flick Donnie Brasco).
Like almost every film that is strikingly different than most, Fear and
Loathing has its own unique set of drawbacks.  But strangely, some of
the worst moments are amongst its most interesting - including an odd
scene in which Duke's attorney makes a pass on a bewildered waitress,
and the introduction of a harmless young painter (Christina Ricci, in a
cameo role).  They may be awkwardly structured and lack an intelligent
meaning, but they at least they give us some insight as to how ferocious
these drug-fucked losers really are.
How I managed to make it to the media screening of Fear and Loathing is
a story in itself.  Catching the train with a friend (who was, at the
time, suffering with a hangover) only minutes before the film started,
just to make it to the cinema fifteen minutes late and not able to find
a way inside.  Five minutes later, the manager arrived and led us
through two locked doors into the "Theatrette", which was so crowed that
we had to sit on the floor and view the screen on an angle.  But
nothing, absolutely nothing, barred the experience for me.
Bold, outrageous and ingenious do make great ingredients for a film; and
although Fear and Loathing occasionally fumbles, it's generally the best
fun any sick human being can have without getting high themselves.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Kevin Patterson
The promotion for FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS has made the film out to be a
comedy, and for about the first hour or so it seems like it might be one. It's
1971, and the hippie movement has left behind quite a few wash-outs, among
them journalist Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his "attorney" Dr. Gonzo (Benito
Del Toro). These two spend most of the film in a drug-induced stupor, having
strange hallucinations, trashing their hotel rooms, and either annoying or
scaring almost everyone that crosses their path. Duke is first assigned to
cover an outdoor desert motorcycle race in Las Vegas, but gets lost in a blur
of drugs, beer, and flying dust, and ends up wandering around with no clue who
won. He leaves Vegas briefly before he is sent back, in what can only be
described as a strangely appropriate twist of fate, to cover a drug
enforcement conference.
FEAR AND LOATHING has been misinterpreted by some as glorifying the use of
drugs. It doesn't, even in the beginning--while the pair's antics are
sometimes amusing and relatively harmless at first, the humor here is still
fairly dark. Director Terry Gilliam views them with a rather satirical eye,
and even when we're laughing, we're laughing at them rather than with them.
They spend most of their time paranoid, angry, or just plain befuddled, which
is probably an understandable reaction to seeing the entire room suddenly fill
up with giant reptiles. The black comedy may be entertaining to watch
onscreen, but it's probably not something most other audience members would
want to experience first-hand.
All this aside, I was starting to grow a bit restless as the film drew near
its one-hour mark, thinking to myself that I wanted something more out of this
than just an off-kilter satire of drug culture. Thankfully, the script
delivers it before too long, as Duke, in a rare moment of lucidity, stops to
recall how he was once an enthusiastic hippie, "riding the wave" of something
that seemed special and important. Now it's six years later and the wave has
finally broken, as he puts it. Materialistic culture is still alive and well
and, for most of this film, right in his face in Las Vegas; the "American
Dream" of which Duke occasionally speaks is still just as shallow and phony as
ever. The social protesters have lost, and the more questionable aspects of
the movement have turned ugly and left casualties such as Duke to drift in a
sea of drugs and disillusionment.
In many ways, FEAR AND LOATHING is Gilliam's most reality-based film; all of
his others, with the exception of THE FISHER KING, have made use of some sort
of fantasy or science-fiction plot elements. Yet it is his off-the-wall
masterpiece BRAZIL to which this film bears the most visual resemblance. The
protagonist of BRAZIL found himself alternately surrounded by a plastic,
soulless society and the constant chaos of totalitarian police inspections and
terrorist attacks, and similarly Duke's world is composed of the artificial,
empty glam of Las Vegas and the bizarre anarchy of his drug hallucinations.
Unlike the protagonist of BRAZIL, however, Duke is not a particularly
admirable figure, and neither is Gonzo. During the latter half of the film,
their trips turn nastier and the consequences worse, eventually building up to
an incident an a diner in which Gonzo crudely frightens and humiliates a
waitress, while Duke, though he doesn't seem to approve, doesn't do anything
to stop it either. By the time this scene takes place, they don't seem like
hippies or peaceniks or protesters or anything of the sort any more; they just
seem like a couple of stoned jerks in a diner. Duke seems to realize at some
level that he's become something he doesn't like, but he's either too
apathetic or too defeated to do anything to change.
This film has taken a critical drubbing from many who view it as an
essentially pointless film that simply throws one trip scene after another at
the audience. While Gilliam may have overdone it in a few places, I think he
and his co-writers deserve more credit than that. There's plenty of substance
here, particularly in the second half; its observations about the broken and
defeated rebels from the '60s and the objects of their rebellion just aren't
usually very pleasant. Unlike, say, BRAZIL or THE FISHER KING, both of which
feature a character who dares to let himself dream in a repressive
environment, FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS shows us someone who's given up on
his dreams and resorts to the quick fix of drugs. In its own psychedelic,
whacked-out way, it's sad and regretful, but I think it's also a bit of a kick
in the pants, a challenge to find an alternative between chemically-induced
withdrawal and the equally addictive drug of Vegas-style materialism. Indeed,
Duke himself admits at one point that he's never learned to accept that you
can get higher without drugs than with them. I'm not sure if he's any closer
to accepting it by the end or not, but I suspect the audience will get the
idea.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Terry Gilliam
Cast:  Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ray Cooper, Wal G. Ludwig, Ellen
Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Katherine Helmond,
Lyle Lovett, Tobey Maguire, Christina Ricci, Harry Dean Stanton, Tim
Thomerson, James Woods
Screenplay:  Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni
Producers:  Patrick Cassavetti, Laila Nabulsi
Runtime:  
US Distribution:  Universal
Rated R:  language, drug use
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A man wakes up in a hotel suite.  He's disoriented from the remnants of
five or six clashing narcotics still sweeping about his body.  He finds
a flashlight taped to his face, and a strange electrical apparatus
mounted to his torso.  He doesn't remember his last conscious moment, or
his last thought, or what he's doing, or why he's there.  He gets off
the bed and finds that he must wade through dirty brown water as deep as
his knees, in which floats vomit and other solidified unpleasantries. 
As he, confused, moves slowly around the suite, memories of rape and
regurgitation flood his mind, and he finds that the only way to feel
better is to do more drugs.
If the above description sounds displeasing to you, welcome to the
human race.  Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, Terry Gilliam's adaptation
of the famous Hunter S. Thompson novel, is perhaps the most viscerally
revolting picture I've ever seen.  It's often a funny movie, and is
enhanced by some terrific acting from Johnny Depp and Benicio Del Toro,
but the film is too real for its own good.  It's a painful and
difficult-to-sit-through exercise in excess.
Many critics would chose to address the similarities between Thompson's
novel and Gilliam's film, but I haven't read the book.  I haven't read
it because I was born many years after the sixties were over, and
because I don't find drugs particularly interesting by themselves.  I
love Gilliam as a film maker though; he is a visual genius, a visionary
in every possible way.  Both Brazil and The Fisher King are wonderful,
intelligent, and moving films.  Fear and Loathing has his style, and is
perfectly conceived in its visual presentation (it's apparently as
faithful an adaptation of the novel as possible).  But he seems to go
off the deep end with style, so much that the film loses all of its
humor by the end and becomes essentially a chore to endure.
There is, in fact, a story here, but I don't know that I could
successfully convey it to you.  It centers around Duke (Depp) and Gonzo
(Del Toro), a couple of guys who do a lot of drugs and specialize in
trashing hotel suites in Las Vegas.  There are a many cameos, and a few
subplots, such as one involving a perverted police officer (Gary
Busey).  There's one about a deprived waitress (Ellen Barkin) in an
all-night diner, and another about a pre-teen artistic religious freak
(Christina Ricci) who primarily creates portraits of Barbara Streisand. 
If there's one thing I can say about the turn of events, it's that
nothing is predictable.
The film begins on a high note, with Duke and Gonzo raging down the
desert highway, thrashed on cocaine, alcohol, and who knows what else
(and they top it off with inhalation of ether).  They think they see
bats, and they try to kill them.  They pick up a hitchhiker, who gets
very scared.  Later, they drop acid, and when they finally reach Vegas,
the strange patterns in the carpeting and wallpaper flows in that way
that people who have done acid might recognize.  Gilliam's presentation
of the material is energetic and never boring, and in these opening
scenes lively and funny.  The way the floor moves in acid-induced
strangeness is particularly interesting, as are all the lizards that
Duke thinks he sees in the cocktail lounge.  Depp, with this role, adds
yet another performance to his list of performances that are vastly
different from one another; here, you can barely tell it's him.  Del
Toro is also good, in a frightening and disgusting sort of way.
But the film is too much by the end.  I'm sure Thompson's novel dabbles
in wretched excess, but Gilliam's film seems excessive for the sake of
being excessive.  We get three (yes, three) close-up shots of people
vomiting their guts out.  What Duke and Gonzo do to their hotel rooms is
so awful, and it just makes me want to look away.  I think that
implications of what the 60s did to drug use still shine through very
clearly, but the film is so sickening and distracting that any kind of
theme simply drowns in the dirty brown water.

Author
Craig Gustafson
For a movie reviled by Serious Film Critics, "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas"
is quite good.  This adaptation of the classic Hunter S. Thompson novel about
a drug-saturated search for the American Dream in 1971 Las Vegas (height of
the Nixon era), has long been considered unfilmable.
Journalist Raoul Duke and his foreign ("probably Samoan") attorney, Dr. Gonzo,
spend a weekend in Vegas, ostensibly to cover first a motorcycle race, then a
District Attorneys convention on the Evils of Drugs.  In reality, they are
there to find out if the lifestyle of the sixties has a chance of survival in
the seventies.  And where better to ask the question than the Playground of
the Nixon Generation?
The main question of the American Dream is perhaps even more pertinent now in
an era when frankly speaking one's mind can land one in court to sit and
ruminate on the heinous offense of "misusing" Freedom of Speech to actually
Offend Someone.
Johnny Depp is brilliant as Raoul Duke.  His is a dead-on performance that
perfectly embodies Duke's curiosity as to just how far society will allow him
to go before he is slapped into jail.  His strongest moment, however, points
up a weakness in the film:
In the scene where the out-of-control Dr. Gonzo threatens a burned-out shrew
of a waitress (Ellen Barkin) with a very large knife, Barkin shines.  She is
heart-breaking in the small role of a tough dame who bites off a bit more than
she can chew.
He is at once embarrassed, discovering that perhaps there is a line not to be
crossed, and filled with pity for the woman.  AND, on top of all that, he
seems appalled and frightened to find these feelings within himself.  It is
masterful film acting.  This complexity, amply displayed in the book, is seen
only in this one scene.
Terry Gilliam's direction is perfect for both the historical and hallucinatory
ambiences of the film.  We are in a Las Vegas that exists both in the "Foul
Era of Nixon" and in a territory that freely embraces people morphing into
literal lounge lizards and carpets that rapidly fill with blood. The point of
the book that Las Vegas in itself is a bad trip is well realized.
As Dr. Gonzo, Benicio del Toro is adequate.  He is most effective when the
Samoan loose cannon is called upon to be quietly, homicidally dangerous.  But
his mumbling does not delineate the rampaging monster of the book.
High points include the faithfulness to the source material.  The high volume
of narration, while Frowned Upon by critics, is literate, compelling and
funny.  A love of the language is evident.  There is also a rousing atmosphere
of Spot the Cameo: appearances are made by, among others, Katherine Helmond,
Cameron Diaz, Gary Busey, Penn Jillette and, hysterically, the real Hunter S.
Thompson.
Low points: Gary Busey's scene as a highway cop.  I won't reveal what happens,
but the comic point is lost: that Duke, when confronted by a non-stereotypical
cop who treats him like a human being, is at a complete loss on how to deal
with the situation.  The Debbie Reynolds scene disappoints, probably due to
budget considerations; Ms. Reynolds, however, graciously supplies her own
voice for a scene that, in the book, made venomous fun of her.
A bit more problematically, the movie runs out of gas near the end.  There is
no real way to wrap up a plotless movie.  The only thing you can do when the
ride is over is to get out of the car.  But the ride is terrific, for the most
part.  And with the top down, it's a breath of fresh air in our land of "Lost
in Space" and "Godzilla."
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Laurence Mixson
Review by Laurence Mixson (venom8@hotmail.com)
a Fullyloaded Entertainment Review: Website Coming Soon!
        Hunter S. Thompson's Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, written in 1971,
is already an American classic; not merely because it was an
unadulterated journey through the post-psychedelia of the 1960's, but
also because it ushered in a new form of journalism known as "gonzo".
Soon after the book was written, Hunter S. Thomspon became the basis for
a character in Doonesbury known as Uncle Duke.
        And that is the problem with Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas(the movie.)
Although the book is one of my favorites, I now agree with Thompson's
own assessment of the novel as "unfilmable." 
        The main problem is that the book, although detailing wild drug use and
tripped-out adventures, was not written on the road. It was written and
edited by Hunter S. Thomspons, relatively sober, at his home. So
although the book depicts drug use and still more drug use, it is told
with a sense of aloofness and some humor. Hunter S. Thomspon, the
narrator, while always drugged out, still has a grip on reality, and can
still tell, with journalistic ability, what is going on around him.
        Not so with the characters in Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas. Despite
name changes and one minor scene from the book dropped, the movie is an
exact duplicate of the book, in terms of dialouge. Unfortunately, this
can get annoying, in the form of Johnny Depp's(who plays
Thompson)excessive narration. And the characters, while having vivid
personalities, are played as 2-D characers on the screen: Dr. Raoul
Duke(Johnny Depp, the name Raoul Duke was an alias of Thompson's) and
his riding companion, Dr. Gonzo(Benicio Del Toro), who is a large Samoan
lawyer, have no personalities or emotions at all, save for stoned.  
        The film is very faithful to the plot(what there is) of the book, in
that Dr. Raoul Duke is sent by Sports Illustrated to cover the Mint 400,
and takes along not only his Samoan lawyer but also car trunk full of
drugs. From there, one set of stoned adventures after another happens,
including one of the few good scenes in which Depp, high on acid,
watches all the people in the bar around him turn into, literally,
lounge lizards.        
        While the movie has its moments(few), it is almost unwatchable at
parts, especially towards the end.  Despite a lot of celebrity cameos,
the stars never get off the ground. The set decoration and costumes are
great, and probably deserve an oscar nomination.  However, as we all
know, it's not sets or effects that make a movie, its the characters;
and quite frankly, these characters are no good.

Author
Omar Odeh
Adapt, the last time I checked, means to 'make suitable for a new use
or situation'. No where in the dictionary that I consulted did it say
to 'clumsily and simple mindedly try to force something into a new
situation.' And yet for some reason the majority of filmmakers seem to
use the latter definition in screen adaptations. (The English Patient,
Forrest Gump etc...) Such films fail because of a misguided approach
to adaptation which usually involves simply directly translating
original material into a photoplay. This ignores that implicit in the
very definition of the word adaptation is a transformation a complete
change to give rise to something new, not a simple translation.  Often
reactions to adaptations will discuss whether 'justice to the
original' was served. To ask a film to do this is ridiculous. Some of
my favourite adaptations have yielded something wholly other than the
original and in so doing simultaneously converges with the tone or
central concerns of that work.  Terry Gilliam's (Brazil, The
Adventures of Baron Munchausen) latest film, Fear and Loathing in Las
Vegas is to be commended for carrying out this imperative despite
source material that was touted as 'unfilmable'. Although it has been
repeated a thousand times elsewhere, the perfect fit between Gilliam's
style and Hunter S. Thompson's 'novel' cannot be overstated. it is
surely because of such a perfect match that Gilliam has been able to
craft a masterwork from an original that would have stumped many
another director.
     The film recounts the misadventures of journalist Raoul Duke
(Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr.  Gonzo (Benicio Del Toro) over the
course of a debilitating weekend in Las Vegas during which Duke is
meant to cover a motorcycle race. The two centrepieces of the
adaptation are the visual design and the tone of the film. Gilliam is
known for paying careful attention to the details of his worlds; not
just the look, but the very shape and texture of them. Director of
Photographer Nicola Pecorini does an outstanding job of rendering a
multiplicity colour to each frame. Instead of a colour scheme that
implies an overriding pattern or logic, most scenes are constructed in
exactly the opposite way.  There are red skies, shifting filter
colours and a hilarious amount of excess. The Vegas setting that
occupies much of the film has never seemed more ominous despite much
more realistic recent portrayals (Leaving Las Vegas). The chaotic
visuals are anchored to a narrative that is exemplary in its subtle
shifts in tone and point of view.  This is the key element that
elevates the film. Through careful manipulation of the duo's
interactions Gilliam is never far from reminding the viewer of the
very temporary nature of theirpleasures. (Not unlike those of the
conventional cinema) Duke's repeated returns to the type writer-
despite his condition making the task seemingly impossible- are an
example of the tonal shifts.  On the one hand it is hilarious that
what comes out is so lucid and yet the whole circumstance itslef is
haunting. Such shifts achieve their greatest effect in one of the
final scenes of the film that occurs in a diner. The ensuing events
can only be described as unsettling and serve as a clear reminder that
the film's ambition lies beyond being a quizzical cult artifact.
    Gilliam goes further to lend the material weight by using a very
carefully constructed soundtrack. A number of aspects of the film call
attention to this device from the very perticular articulations of the
two main characters, to the final third of the film that finds Duke
trying to reconstruct past events from a sound recording of them. The
sound effects found throughout the film are rarely only the directly
motivated sounds of on-screen events. The result is a soundtrack that
contributes to the discomfort felt throughout the film but also denies
the convenient conclusion of a single unified and coherent narrator.
The voice-over is a big part of this density that Gilliam acheves
through sound. Although nitially the voice-over is ostensibly a
conventional first person narration, through the course of the film
this gets collapsed with the 'read-over' of Duke's writing. The
bridging of this gap further undermines the protoagonist as a reliable
narrator and puts into question any notions of the two protagonists as
heroes.
    Some of the moments in the film that most terrified me are the
interations between the two main characters - played impeccably by
Depp and Del Toro - and the other Vegas dwellers. It is this
interations that show the chasm like gap that exists between the two
protagonists and the current conventions. This is very much the matter
of the film as opposed to it being purly 'about drugs'.  The early
scene in which bar patrons take on the semblance of giant lizards
signals any such interactions as important moments in the film: The
subsequent scenes involving Duke trying to leave his hotel without
paying or Gonzo scaring people in a neighbouring car are chilling
reminders of what side of the spectrum most of us occupy.  
-Omar Odeh http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Theater/3920

Author
Scott Renshaw
FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS
(Universal)
Starring:  Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro.
Screenplay:  Terry Gilliam & Tony Grisoni and Tod Davies & Alex Cox.
Producers:  Laila Nabulsi, Patrick Cassavetti and Stephen Nemeth.
Director:  Terry Gilliam.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, brief gore, drug use, adult themes)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Terry Gilliam's FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS is about as faithful
an adaptation of Hunter S. Thompson's 1971 "gonzo journalism" classic as I
can imagine...though that's not necessarily a good thing.  The book has
long been called "unfilmable," which probably referred more to whether it
_should_ be made than whether it _could_ be made.  As it happens, FEAR AND
LOATHING on film is nearly an event-for-event re-creation of the
adventures of journalist Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his attorney Dr.
Gonzo (Benicio Del Toro), kindred spirits who ingest every possible
controlled substance during a wild spree through Vegas, ostensibly while
covering an off-road race and/or a law enforcement narcotics conference.
It's wild, perverse, incoherent, sometimes very funny, and too visually
literal an adaptation of a book best left to a twisted imagination.
     In terms of tone, at least, it's a nearly flawless companion piece to
Thompson's book.  The writer's descriptions of tripping on everything from
acid to mescaline to ether never assaulted the reader with horror stories
of harrowing experiences.  They were essentially journalistic, clinical
analyses where even the most unpleasant situations were softened with a
dollop of deadpan, left-field humor.  Gilliam similarly finds the demented
gag in every situation, including a hallucinogenic orgy of lounge lizards
(rendered as actual reptiles by makeup whiz Rob Bottin), while still
acknowledging the squalor.  With Depp doing a hilariously spot-on
performance of Thompson-as-Duke and Del Toro sporting plenty of extra flab
as the unhinged Dr. Gonzo, FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS feels exactly
like it should feel:  a cockeyed white-water rafting tour down a polluted
stream of consciousness.
     It's also true that an episodic film like FEAR AND LOATHING is only
as successful as its individual episodes.  Some of the most memorable ones
are grand pieces of absurdist theater:  Duke trying to skip out on a hotel
bill as a desk clerk detains him; Duke and Gonzo doing coke at the
narcotics conference while surrounded by cops; a flashback to Duke's first
acid trip in a nightclub restroom.  There are also several scenes which
turn absolute fidelity to the source material into grinding sluggishness.
At nearly two hours, FEAR AND LOATHING could have used some judicious
trimming; once we understand the situation and the characters, encounters
like Gonzo's showdown with a diner waitress (Ellen Barkin) feel like
excess weight.  A head-trip film like this one is better suited for 90
minutes of damn-the-torpedoes pacing than for this kind of reverence.
     Gilliam also manages to extract Thompson's one and only "message"
regarding the drug culture of the 60s and early 70s.  The film's temporal
setting -- "this foul Year of Our Lord nineteen hundred and seventy-one"
-- is defined as a turning point in the use and perception of drugs, with
the innocent notion of chemicals as reality-expanding tools giving way to
chemicals as reality-numbing tools.  Even here Gilliam's fidelity to the
source undermines him, as images of Vietnam and Nixon point a too-obvious
accusatory finger, with Thompson's own unapologetic voice subverted by
suggestions that he's just a victim of the times.  The audience for a film
as down and dirty as this one is limited anyway, but the now-anachronistic
incorrectness man not even appeal to the like-minded.
     FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS does do a solid job of capturing the
era's madness in a city which is a madhouse distillation of the American
dream; it's a scattershot rendering of a scattershot story told with
scattershot effectiveness.  It's also consistently intriguing, if for no
other reason than Gilliam's willingness to go every ugly place Thompson's
book went.  The only thing really wrong with Gilliam's FEAR AND LOATHING
is that it's a movie, bringing into vivid color that which should only
have lived on the page.  Gonzo film-making doesn't end up with quite the
same rebellious spark.

Author
John Roberdeau
Director: Terry Gilliam
Writers: Based on the book by Hunter S. Thompson.
         Screenplay by Terry Gilliam & Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies & Alex Cox
Producers: Laila Nabulsi, Patrick Cassavetti, Stephen Nemeth
This movie is not for everyone.  It's important to get that out of the way
at the outset.  It's a strange, disturbing, confusing, and considerably
offensive movie, and it's without question one of my all-time favorites.
When I first heard of this movie back before it was released in theaters,
I was excited about it, though I'd never even heard of the book.  I
originally discovered it when I was trying to check up on whatever Terry
Gilliam's new project might be.  You might know him from any of a number of
excellent movies he has directed including "12 Monkeys",
"Brazil", and "The Fisher King".  Anyway, I was very favorably surprised to
find that this, his next movie, was going to star two of my favorite actors,
Depp (go see "Donnie Brasco", "Ed Wood", and "Edward Scissorhands") and Del
Toro ("The Usual Suspects" and many small but incredible roles).
Anyway, to the movie at hand.  It is, simply put, about drugs.  Slightly
less simply put, it is "A Savage Journey to the Heart of the American
Dream".
The plot revolves around two compatriots, a doctor of journalism and his
attorney, who are sent to Las Vegas to cover a motorcycle race for the
magazine Raoul Duke (Depp) works for.  This business trip (no pun intended)
quickly turns into an extended orgy of drug use, mayhem, and (dare I say)
hilarity.  The movie is clearly a comedy, but there are many moments where
the experience becomes oppressive -- too strange, too demented.
Like the book (which I rapidly bought and read after seeing the film), the
movie is able to rapidly and seamlessly go from ridiculous humor to
disturbing and uncomfortable strangeness to a really poetic and thought
provoking narration.  Actually, almost everything in the movie is word for
word, image for image taken from the book.  It's a very faithful
reproduction.
As I said, it's definitely not something everyone would like, but I strongly
urge everyone who thinks there is any chance they would like it to give it
some serious thought.

Author
Nicholas Amado
Starring: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro
Terry Gilliam is a very strange fellow. But why he thought Hunter
S. Thompson's book would make a good film is beyond me. It isn't as if
Gilliam and his team of talented artists didn't make a fine attepmt,
indeed they did. But Fear and Loathing is a two hour mind trip. And
like a trip it has no substance and no purpose.
What makes the film watchable is the performance of Johnny
Depp. Though some may wonder why he chose such a pointless story to
work with, it is clear that the character was a challenge to
re-create. (Apparently , he did a great amount of research on
Thompson.) Benicio Del Toro gives a fantastic performance as well,
perhaps the best of his career to date. But Del Toro's character is as
unappealing as Depp's is strangely compelling.
Depp plays the part with a certain goofiness that never crosses the
line into menace or threat. Del Toro plays a slob of a scary scumbag
that never approaches goofiness or appeal. The two have a great deal
of screentime together, sharing acid and ether trips in various Las
Vegas locations. But there is never really a development of comraderie
between them. Seeing as the film lacks a central point, it seems that
the least Gilliam and co-screenwriters Todd Dunes and Alex Cox could
give us a good pair of buddies to carry the film. But sadly, we are
left only with Depp's funky facial expressions and whacky walks to
amuse us.
Johnny Depp, who is rapidly proving why he is one of the most gifted
actors of his generation, also creates a fantastic vocal sound for his
character, a kind of cross between Elvis Presley and Robert
Mitchum. That voice, combined with the cigarette holder which dangles
from his lip in every single shot, helped form an otherwise bland
character into something watchable and slightly entertaing.
Fear and Loathing begins with numerous trips that required digital
effects. Carpet paterns coming to life, bats flocking toward Depp's
eye, and faces being pulled and distorted in all directions. It is
rather a letdown, then, when the effects suddenly stop and all of the
following acid trips are portrayed only in the reactions the actors
have to them. One is an incredibly vivid and rather annoying scene in
which Depp trys to calm Del Toro who is sitting in murky bath wather
with grapefruit peels floating around him.
Indeed, the visuals in Fear and Loathing are unique and often cool to
look at, but if Depp's fine performance can't save this film, then
neither can they. Nor does the fine camera work by Nicola Pecorini do
enough to save it.
Gilliam is certainly better than this. Fear and Loathing suffered from
a lack of point, drive and in some spots, ambition. Other than telling
you that Depp is a writer on an assignment and he goes to Vegas with
his junkie attorney, I can't tell you what I really watched for two
hours. That's about as far into plot synopsis as I can get. But one
thing I can tell you...Terry Gilliam is a very strange fellow.

Author
Matt Williams
This is not a movie for everyone.  Its intense surrealistic drug imagery
is at once intriguing and revolting.  The film doesn't have a strong
point, but it tells it vividly and with an intense visual flair.
Johnny Depp stars as journalist Hunter S. Thompson (going under the
alias Raoul Duke).  In early 1971, he is given an assignment to travel
to Las Vegas and cover the Mint 400, a motorcycle race in the desert. He
hooks up with his attorney, Oscar Acosta (Benicio Del Toro) aka Dr.
Gonzo, and together they plan to visit Vegas on one of the most intense
drug and booze benders the world has ever seen.
Riding in a fire apple red convertible at top speed across the desert,
and with a trunk full of nearly every dangerous illegal drug imaginable,
the pair enter Las Vegas, where possession of mere marijuana carries a
20-year prison term.  But they don't let little things like laws or
societal norms stand in the way of hitting their psychedelic highs.
If the film has a statement, it is a portrayal of the aftermath of the
60s.  Raoul Duke and Dr. Gonzo are no longer heroes of a people's
revolution, but merely the distorted and discarded flotsam and jetsam of
time.  The purpose of the sixties had reached its final resting place:
the ultimate indulgence of self-gratification.
The film doesn't quite have a plot.  The shreds of one are lost in the
haze of the protagonists' drug induced stupor.  Instead, the film plays
as a series of vignettes detailing the steady descent from normality
into utter depravity.
More of a surreal experience than a movie, the film does manage to
capture the stream-of-consciousness feeling of Thompson's book. Whether
or not that is a good thing depends on your own particular tolerances.
A few of the sequences in the movie drag on a bit long, and the film
treads a thin line with its humor.  That humor comes in two varieties:
watching the hallucinating fools do foolish things, and observing the
clash between the normal Vegas folk and the drug fiends.  The former is
amusing at first, but quickly wears out its welcome...however, there's
enough of the latter to prop up the movie in its weak spots.
Johnny Depp is playing a broad caricature here, but he manages to make
the character interesting.  Benicio Del Toro goes deep into character...
so deep that he's hardly recognizable in the film. The rest of the film
is flooded with cameos by everyone from Cameron Diaz and Christina Ricci
to Ellen Barkin and Gary Busey. Even Penn Jilette and Lyle Lovett pop up
here and there.
If you enjoyed the book, you'll find the movie about as good an
adaptation as you could hope for.  If the description in this review
didn't sound the slightest bit intriguing...this film is not for you.
Whatever the case, if you see the film, you'll never look at hotel
carpeting the same way again.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases
